West Virginia, session 2026, HB4944.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 4. COUNTY SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS. §18-4-4. Compensation. On or before June 1 of the year in which the superintendent is appointed, the board shall fix the annual salary of the superintendent for the period of appointment for the term beginning on the following July 1. The board shall pay the salary from the general current expense fund of the district.Beginning July 1, 2027, the salaries of all county superintendents of schools shall be based on the student population of the county in which he or she serves.  The Department of Education shall develop and establish a formula and schedule to set the maximum salary for the superintendents of each of the 55 counties based on the student population of each county. The salaries shall be prorated in relation to each other to provide equitable maximum salaries so that maximum salaries shall increase proportionately based on the student population and the maximum salary shall be the same per pupil in each county. The schedule shall be revised not less than every five years.